Hawaii statutes.
§382-6 Termination of government
operations. Whenever the governor finds that any company whose plant or
facilities are being operated by the State is in a position to resume
immediately and continue the operation of its plants and facilities without interruption,
or that government operation of the plant or facilities of any company is no
longer required for the public health, safety, and welfare, the governor shall
terminate government operation of the plant and facilities and shall restore
the same to the company. [L 1951, c 209, §5; RL 1955, §92-7; HRS §382-6; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next